Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 6 Minors

§ 12-6-101.
Sale or possession prohibited; when possession unlawful; public drunkenness; falsification of identification; penalty; prima facie identification as defense.

Any person who sells, furnishes, gives or causes to be sold, furnished or given away any alcoholic liquor or malt beverage to any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years, who is not his legal ward, medical patient or member of his own immediate family, is guilty of a misdemeanor. This subsection does not apply to sales by the division or a wholesaler to a licensee under this title.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 6, § 2.

Except as otherwise provided in this title, no person under the age of twenty-one (21) years shall:

Purchase or attempt to purchase any alcoholic liquor or malt beverage;

Solicit another person to purchase alcoholic liquor or malt beverage;

Possess any alcoholic liquor or malt beverage;

Consume any ethyl alcohol;

Have measurable blood, breath or urine alcohol concentration in his body;

Enter or remain in designated sales areas approved by the local licensing authority that is primarily for off-premise sales of alcoholic liquor or malt beverages unless accompanied by a parent, spouse or legal guardian who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older; or

Dispense or sell any alcoholic liquor or malt beverage. The term “dispensing” means mixing or pouring alcoholic liquors or malt beverages.

This section shall not apply to possession of alcoholic liquor or malt beverages or consumption of ethyl alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years in accordance with this title:

Who is in the physical presence of his parent, spouse or legal guardian who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older;

As part of a church’s or religious organization’s religious services; or

For medicinal purposes if the alcoholic liquor, malt beverage or ethyl alcohol is furnished:

By the person’s parent, spouse or legal guardian who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older; or

Pursuant to a lawful prescription.

The prohibitions against possession of alcoholic liquor or malt beverages by a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years specified in this section shall not apply:

When the person is making a delivery of alcoholic liquor or malt beverages pursuant to his employment;

When the person is serving alcoholic liquor or malt beverages pursuant to his employment in a restaurant which holds a license to serve alcoholic liquor or malt beverages, if the person is at least eighteen (18) years of age. The term “serving” in this paragraph does not include the mixing or dispensing of alcoholic beverages; or

To a person who is a licensee under this title.

Any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years who attempts in any manner to purchase alcoholic or malt beverages or who falsifies any identification or uses any false identification in order to obtain alcoholic or malt beverages is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person who violates this section, or aids, abets or incites any violation hereof, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

A motor vehicle driver’s license or valid picture identification card issued by any state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, a permanent resident card issued by the United States citizenship and immigration services, a valid picture identification card issued to a member of the armed forces or an internationally accepted passport document with a discernible date of birth and photograph is prima facie evidence of the age and identity of a person. Proof that a licensee or his employee or agent demanded, was shown and acted in reasonable reliance upon the information contained in any one (1) of the above documents as identification is a defense to any criminal prosecution or action for the suspension or revocation of a license.

For purposes of this section, “ethyl alcohol” means any substance which is or contains ethyl alcohol.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 9; 1945, ch. 133, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 53-209; Laws 1949, ch. 136, § 3; 1953, ch. 144, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 12-33(b), (c), (d), (e); Laws 1965, ch. 130, §§ 2, 3; 1969, ch. 162, § 1; 1973, ch. 213, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-135; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, § 2; 1985, ch. 92, § 2; 1988, ch. 44, § 1; 1996, ch. 122, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 103, § 1; 2005, ch. 78, § 1; 2007, ch. 116, § 1; 2010, ch. 6, §§ 1, 2; 2013 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to notice to cease furnishing alcohol to minor or habitual drunkard, see §

12-5-502

.

As to general penalty for violations, see §

12-8-101

.

As to prohibition of child employment in certain occupations, see §

27-6-112

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “issued by any state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico or by an official governmental agency of Canada or Mexico, a permanent resident card issued by the United States citizenship and immigration services” for “a registration certificate issued under the Federal Military Selective Service Act” in (e).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b)(v) added the last sentence.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, repealed former (b) pertaining to minors with possession or under the influence of alcohol, malt beverage or controlled substances; added (c) through (e) and redesignated former (c) through (e) as (f) through (h), and added (j).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (h) inserted “or valid picture identification card”; deleted “or by an official governmental agency of Canada or Mexico,” following “Puerto Rico”; substituted “a valid picture” for “an” following “immigration, services”; deleted “or an identification card issued by the department of transportation” following “birth and photograph”; and
made stylistic changes throughout the section.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” in (a).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added (c)(vi) and made related changes.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "designated sales areas approved by the local licensing authority" for "an establishment" in (c)(vi); added (c)(vii); and made related changes.

Construction. —

Possession of alcoholic or malt beverage by any person under the age of 21 need not occur on “any street or highway or in any public place” in order for subsection (b) to be violated; rather, possession by anyone under the age of 21 is prohibited regardless of location, public or private, except in those instances specifically exempted in paragraphs (i) through (v). Tietema v. State, 926 P.2d 952,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1996).

Subsection (a) establishes a duty toward the general public;

it is not meant only to protect minors. McClellan v. Tottenhoff, 666 P.2d 408,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1983), limited, Greenwalt v. Ram Rest. Corp., 2003 WY 77, 71 P.3d 717,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2003).

Violation of subsection (a) is evidence of negligence

and may be considered by the trier of fact together with other circumstances in determining the issue of negligence. McClellan v. Tottenhoff, 666 P.2d 408,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1983), limited, Greenwalt v. Ram Rest. Corp., 2003 WY 77, 71 P.3d 717,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2003).

Defense to charge of selling to minor. —

A licensee must exercise the caution which would be shown by a reasonable and prudent person in the same or similar circumstances in order to constitute a defense to a charge of selling alcoholic or malt beverages to a minor. Rancher Bar & Lounge v. State, 514 P.2d 634,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 1973).

Insufficient grounds established for defense. —

Liquor licensee's employee took insufficient steps upon which to base a reasonable reliance so as to establish a defense to a charge of sale to a minor where he noted only the height and weight on customer's driver's license giving no attention to other data contained on the license, such as hair and eye color, and further, there were other details on the license which admitted of some checking, the social security number and, in a case where there was no photograph, the signature. Rancher Bar & Lounge v. State, 514 P.2d 634,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 1973).

Liability of homeowners for intoxicated minors. —

In a case where teenage boys who were staying on the homeowners' property became intoxicated and proceeded to get in car wreck which resulted in the death of two of the boys and injuries to a third boy, because the injured boy's parents' complaint did not allege that the homeowners provided the alcohol to the boys and it did not allege that they knew or should have known that the boys would soon be driving an automobile, it was not an abuse of discretion for the district court to dismiss the parents' complaint for failure to state a claim upon which relief could be granted pursuant to W.R.C.P. 12(b)(6). Daniels v. Carpenter, 2003 WY 11, 62 P.3d 555,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 2003).

“Minor in possession” deemed separate offense. —

The “minor in possession” offense described in subsection (b) of this section is not the same offense as “accessory before the fact” to larceny of whiskey under the criminal code, nor does it merge into or become an included offense. Mullin v. State, 505 P.2d 305,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 414 U.S. 940, 94 S. Ct. 245, 38 L. Ed. 2d 166, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 1063 (U.S. 1973).

Applied

in

Brown v. Riner, 500 P.2d 524,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1972).

Quoted

in

White v. Board of Trustees, 648 P.2d 528,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 361

(Wyo. 1982); State v. Denhardt, 760 P.2d 988,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 1988); White v. Ha, Inc., 782 P.2d 1125,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 225

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Johnson v. State Hearing Exmrs. Office, 838 P.2d 158,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1992); Naibauer v. Board of Platte County Comm'rs, 895 P.2d 445,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1995); Heinemann v. State, 12 P.3d 692,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 2000); Greenwalt v. Ram Rest. Corp., 2003 WY 77, 71 P.3d 717,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2003); Cloud v. State, 2014 WY 113,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Sept. 10, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Prosecution as a Juvenile or an Adult? Is the Discretion Vested in the District Attorney by Section 14-6-203(c) of the Wyoming Statutes Unconstitutional and Violative of the Proper Role of a Prosecutor?” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1984).

For case note, “Torts — Injuries Arising From Negligence in Furnishing Liquor to Minors and Intoxicated Adults: New Tort Action in Wyoming. McClellan v. Tottenhoff, 666 P.2d 408,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 285 (1984).

For comment, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Ignorance or mistake regarding purchaser's age as affecting criminal offense of selling liquor to minor (or person under specified age), 12 ALR3d 991.

What constitutes violation of enactment prohibiting sale of intoxicating liquor to minor, 89 ALR3d 1256.

Choice of law as to liability of liquor seller for injuries caused by intoxicated person, 2 ALR4th 952.

Employer's liability for furnishing or permitting liquor on social occasion, 51 ALR4th 1048.

Tort liability of college or university for injury suffered by student as a result of own or fellow student's intoxication, 62 ALR4th 81.

Social host's liability for death or injuries incurred by person to whom alcohol was served, 54 ALR5th 313.

§ 12-6-102.
Transporting or possessing in motor vehicle with intent to furnish to person under 21; penalties.

No person who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age shall transport, or have in his possession or control, any alcoholic liquor or malt beverage, with the intent of furnishing the same to any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years, while operating or occupying a motor vehicle.

Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or both. Upon a second or any subsequent conviction under this subsection the person is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state penitentiary for a term not exceeding five (5) years.

In addition to the penalty provided in subsection (b) of this section the division of motor vehicles shall suspend, for a period of one (1) year, the driver’s license and automobile registration of any person convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of this section. The license suspension shall not run concurrent with any term of imprisonment, if imposed, but shall commence on the last day of incarceration.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 18, §§ 1-3; W.S. 1957, §§ 12-34.1 to 12-34.3; W.S. 1977, §§ 12-2-137 to 12-2-139; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1988, ch. 44, § 1.

Phrase “while operating or occupying a motor vehicle” in subsection (a) modifies word “minor.”

Given that construction, it is necessary to allege that the minor was either operating or occupying a motor vehicle in order to pursue a prosecution under subsection (a). State v. Denhardt, 760 P.2d 988,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 1988).

Subsection (a) not unconstitutionally vague. —

Subsection (a) adequately serves notice to any man of ordinary intelligence that furnishing alcoholic beverages to minors who either are operating or occupying a motor vehicle is prohibited conduct. For this reason, it cannot be considered as unconstitutionally vague. State v. Denhardt, 760 P.2d 988,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 12-6-103.
Compliance.

The department of health, working with local law enforcement agencies and other local individuals and organizations shall be the lead agency in the administration of this article. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to limit or otherwise alter the authority granted to the department of revenue under any other provision of title 12.

The department of health shall develop strategies to coordinate and support local law enforcement efforts in the enforcement of all state statutes relating to the prohibition of the sale of alcohol products to minors.

The department of health shall have discretion to work with local agencies and individuals in the coordination of local education, prevention and enforcement efforts that appropriately reflect the needs of the community.

For purposes of this section, the term “compliance check” shall mean an inspection conducted pursuant to the provisions of this section for purposes of education or enforcement of laws prohibiting the sale of alcohol to minors. The use of persons age eighteen (18) to twenty-one (21) during compliance checks is authorized subject to the following:

A person participating in a compliance check shall, if questioned, state his true age and that he is less than twenty-one (21) years of age;

The person’s appearance shall not be altered to make him appear to be twenty-one (21) years of age or older;

Neither a person age eighteen (18) to twenty-one (21) nor his parents or guardians shall be coerced into participating in such inspections;

In the event that a citation may result the person conducting the compliance check shall photograph the participant immediately before the compliance check and any photographs taken of the participant shall be retained by the person conducting the compliance check;

Any participant or adult aiding a participant in a compliance check under this section shall be granted immunity from prosecution under W.S.

12-6-101

.

The person conducting a compliance check under this section shall:

Remain within sight or sound of the participant attempting to make the purchase;

Immediately inform in writing a representative or agent of the business establishment that a compliance check has been performed and the results of the compliance check;

If the compliance check may result in a citation, within two (2) days, prepare a report of the compliance check containing:

The name of the person who supervised the compliance check;

The age and date of birth of the participant who assisted in the compliance check;

The name and position of the person from whom the participant attempted to purchase alcoholic beverages;

The name and address of the establishment checked;

The date and time of the compliance check; and

The results of the compliance check, including whether the compliance check resulted in the sale or distribution of, or offering for sale, alcoholic beverages to the minor.

Immediately upon completion of the report required under this subsection, provide a copy of the report to a representative or agent of the business establishment that was checked;

Request a law enforcement officer to issue a citation for any illegal acts relating to providing alcoholic beverages to minors during the compliance check.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 81, § 1; 2017 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, at the end of (d)(v), deleted “and

12-5-203

.”

Cross references. —

For provisions of the Substance Abuse Control Plan, see §

9-2-2701

et seq.